Florida, session 2026, SB902.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 78 79 Section 1.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1), paragraphs (a) 80 and (c) of subsection (3), paragraph (h) of subsection (4), 81 paragraph (a) of subsection (8), and subsection (11) of section 82 381.986, Florida Statutes, are amended, to read: 83 381.986âMedical use of marijuana.â 84 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 85 (f)ââLow-THC cannabisâ means a plant of the genus Cannabis, 86 whether growing or not the dried flowers of which contain 0.8 87 percent or less of tetrahydrocannabinol and more than 10 percent 88 of cannabidiol weight for weight; the seeds thereof; the resin 89 extracted from any part of such plant; and every or any 90 compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation 91 of such plant or its seeds or resin, excluding edibles; which 92 contains 0.8 percent or less of tetrahydrocannabinol and more 93 than 2 percent of cannabidiol, weight for weight, which that is 94 dispensed from a medical marijuana treatment center. 95 (3)âQUALIFIED PHYSICIANS AND MEDICAL DIRECTORS.â 96 (a)âBefore being approved as a qualified physician and 97 before each license renewal, a physician must successfully 98 complete a 2-hour course and subsequent examination offered by 99 the Florida Medical Association or the Florida Osteopathic 100 Medical Association which encompass the requirements of this 101 section and any rules adopted hereunder. Qualified physicians 102 must renew the course certification biennially. The course and 103 examination must be administered at least annually and may be 104 offered in a distance learning format, including an electronic, 105 online format that is available upon request. The price of the 106 course may not exceed $500. 107 (c)âBefore being employed as a medical director and before 108 each license renewal, a medical director must successfully 109 complete a 2-hour course and subsequent examination offered by 110 the Florida Medical Association or the Florida Osteopathic 111 Medical Association which encompass the requirements of this 112 section and any rules adopted hereunder. Medical directors must 113 renew the course certification biennially. The course and 114 examination must be administered at least annually and may be 115 offered in a distance learning format, including an electronic, 116 online format that is available upon request. The price of the 117 course may not exceed $500. 118 (4)âPHYSICIAN CERTIFICATION.â 119 (h)âAn active order for low-THC cannabis or medical 120 cannabis issued pursuant to former s. 381.986, Florida Statutes 121 2016, and registered with the compassionate use registry before 122 June 23, 2017, is deemed a physician certification, and all 123 patients possessing such orders are deemed qualified patients 124 until the department begins issuing medical marijuana use 125 registry identification cards. 126 (8)âMEDICAL MARIJUANA TREATMENT CENTERS.â 127 (a)âThe department shall license medical marijuana 128 treatment centers to ensure reasonable statewide accessibility 129 and availability as necessary for qualified patients registered 130 in the medical marijuana use registry and who are issued a 131 physician certification under this section. 132 1.âAs soon as practicable, but no later than July 3, 2017, 133 the department shall license as a medical marijuana treatment 134 center any entity that holds an active, unrestricted license to 135 cultivate, process, transport, and dispense low-THC cannabis, 136 medical cannabis, and cannabis delivery devices, under former s. 137 381.986, Florida Statutes 2016, before July 1, 2017, and which 138 meets the requirements of this section. In addition to the 139 authority granted under this section, these entities are 140 authorized to dispense low-THC cannabis, medical cannabis, and 141 cannabis delivery devices ordered pursuant to former s. 381.986, 142 Florida Statutes 2016, which were entered into the compassionate 143 use registry before July 1, 2017, and are authorized to begin 144 dispensing marijuana under this section on July 3, 2017. The 145 department may grant variances from the representations made in 146 such an entityâs original application for approval under former 147 s. 381.986, Florida Statutes 2014, pursuant to paragraph (e). 148 2.âThe department shall license as medical marijuana 149 treatment centers 10 applicants that meet the requirements of 150 this section, under the following parameters: 151 a.âAs soon as practicable, but no later than August 1, 152 2017, the department shall license any applicant whose 153 application was reviewed, evaluated, and scored by the 154 department and which was denied a dispensing organization 155 license by the department under former s. 381.986, Florida 156 Statutes 2014; which had one or more administrative or judicial 157 challenges pending as of January 1, 2017, or had a final ranking 158 within one point of the highest final ranking in its region 159 under former s. 381.986, Florida Statutes 2014; which meets the 160 requirements of this section; and which provides documentation 161 to the department that it has the existing infrastructure and 162 technical and technological ability to begin cultivating 163 marijuana within 30 days after registration as a medical 164 marijuana treatment center. 165 b.âAs soon as practicable, the department shall license one 166 applicant that is a recognized class member of Pigford v. 167 Glickman, 185 F.R.D. 82 (D.D.C. 1999), or In Re Black Farmers 168 Litig., 856 F. Supp. 2d 1 (D.D.C. 2011). An applicant licensed 169 under this sub-subparagraph is exempt from the requirement of 170 subparagraph (b)2. An applicant that applies for licensure under 171 this sub-subparagraph, pays its initial application fee, is 172 determined by the department through the application process to 173 qualify as a recognized class member, and is not awarded a 174 license under this sub-subparagraph may transfer its initial 175 application fee to one subsequent opportunity to apply for 176 licensure under subparagraph 4. 177 c.âAs soon as practicable, but no later than October 3, 178 2017, the department shall license applicants that meet the 179 requirements of this section in sufficient numbers to result in 180 10 total licenses issued under this subparagraph, while 181 accounting for the number of licenses issued under sub 182 subparagraphs a. and b. 183 3.âFor up to two of the licenses issued under subparagraph 184 2., the department shall give preference to applicants that 185 demonstrate in their applications that they own one or more 186 facilities that are, or were, used for the canning, 187 concentrating, or otherwise processing of citrus fruit or citrus 188 molasses and will use or convert the facility or facilities for 189 the processing of marijuana. 190 4.âWithin 6 months after the registration of 100,000 active 191 qualified patients in the medical marijuana use registry, the 192 department shall license four additional medical marijuana 193 treatment centers that meet the requirements of this section. 194 Thereafter, the department shall license four medical marijuana 195 treatment centers within 6 months after the registration of each 196 additional 100,000 active qualified patients in the medical 197 marijuana use registry that meet the requirements of this 198 section. 199 (11)âPREEMPTION.âRegulation of cultivation, processing, and 200 delivery of marijuana by medical marijuana treatment centers is 201 preempted to the state except as provided in this subsection. 202 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âparkâ means any 203 public or private property, excluding private residences, which 204 has equipment specifically installed for childrenâs athletic, 205 recreational, or leisure activities, including, but not limited 206 to, playgrounds and athletic playing fields. The term does not 207 include conservation and recreation lands acquired in accordance 208 with chapter 259 or conservation and recreation lands designated 209 by a local government, unless such lands contain equipment 210 installed for childrenâs athletic, recreational, or leisure 211 activities. 212 (b)(a)âA medical marijuana treatment center cultivating or 213 processing facility may not be located within 500 feet of the 214 real property that comprises a park, a child care facility as 215 defined in s. 402.302, a facility that provides early learning 216 services as specified in s. 1000.04(1), or a public or private 217 elementary school, middle school, or secondary school. The 218 subsequent establishment of any such park, child care facility, 219 early learning facility, or school after the approval of the 220 medical marijuana treatment center cultivating or processing 221 facility does not affect the continued operation or location of 222 the approved cultivating or processing facility. A medical 223 marijuana treatment center cultivating or processing facility 224 that was approved by the department before July 1, 2026, is 225 exempt from the distance restrictions relating to parks, child 226 care facilities, and early learning facilities. 227 (c)(b)1.âA county or municipality may, by ordinance, ban 228 medical marijuana treatment center dispensing facilities from 229 being located within the boundaries of that county or 230 municipality. A county or municipality that does not ban 231 dispensing facilities under this subparagraph may not place 232 specific limits, by ordinance, on the number of dispensing 233 facilities that may locate within that county or municipality. 234 2.âA municipality may determine by ordinance the criteria 235 for the location of, and other permitting requirements that do 236 not conflict with state law or department rule for, medical 237 marijuana treatment center dispensing facilities located within 238 the boundaries of that municipality. A county may determine by 239 ordinance the criteria for the location of, and other permitting 240 requirements that do not conflict with state law or department 241 rule for, all such dispensing facilities located within the 242 unincorporated areas of that county. Except as provided in 243 paragraph (d) (c), a county or municipality may not enact 244 ordinances for permitting or for determining the location of 245 dispensing facilities which are more restrictive than its 246 ordinances permitting or determining the locations for 247 pharmacies licensed under chapter 465. A municipality or county 248 may not charge a medical marijuana treatment center a license or 249 permit fee in an amount greater than the fee charged by such 250 municipality or county to pharmacies. A dispensing facility 251 location approved by a municipality or county pursuant to former 252 s. 381.986(8)(b), Florida Statutes 2016, is not subject to the 253 location requirements of this subsection. 254 (d)(c)âA medical marijuana treatment center dispensing 255 facility may not be located within 500 feet of the real property 256 that comprises a park, a child care facility as defined in s. 257 402.302, a facility that provides early learning services as 258 specified in s. 1000.04(1), or a public or private elementary 259 school, middle school, or secondary school unless the county or 260 municipality approves the location through a formal proceeding 261 open to the public at which the county or municipality 262 determines that the location promotes the public health, safety, 263 and general welfare of the community. The subsequent 264 establishment of any such park, child care facility, early 265 learning facility, or school after the approval of the medical 266 marijuana treatment center dispensing facility does not affect 267 the continued operation or location of the approved dispensing 268 facility. A medical marijuana treatment center dispensing 269 facility that was approved by the department before July 1, 270 2026, is exempt from the distance restrictions relating to 271 parks, child care facilities, and early learning facilities. 272 (e)(d)âThis subsection does not prohibit any local 273 jurisdiction from ensuring medical marijuana treatment center 274 facilities comply with the Florida Building Code, the Florida 275 Fire Prevention Code, or any local amendments to the Florida 276 Building Code or the Florida Fire Prevention Code. 277 Section 2.âSection 381.994, Florida Statutes, is created to 278 read: 279 381.994âNeurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program.â 280 (1)(a)âThere is created within the Department of Health the 281 Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program. The purpose of the 282 program is to advance the progress of research and cures for 283 neurofibromatosis by awarding grants through a competitive, 284 peer-reviewed process. 285 (b)âSubject to legislative appropriation, the program shall 286 award grants for scientific and clinical research to further the 287 search for new diagnostics, treatments, and cures for 288 neurofibromatosis. 289 (2)(a)âApplications for grants for neurofibromatosis 290 disease research may be submitted by any university or 291 established research institute in this state. All qualified 292 investigators in this state, regardless of institutional 293 affiliation, shall have equal access and opportunity to compete 294 for the research funding. Preference may be given to grant 295 proposals that foster collaboration among institutions, 296 researchers, and community practitioners, as such proposals 297 support the advancement of treatments and cures of 298 neurofibromatosis through basic or applied research. Grants 299 shall be awarded by the department, after consultation with the 300 Rare Disease Advisory Council under s. 381.99, on the basis of 301 scientific merit, as determined by the competitive, peer 302 reviewed process to ensure objectivity, consistency, and high 303 quality. The following types of applications may be considered 304 for funding: 305 1.âInvestigator-initiated research grants. 306 2.âInstitutional research grants. 307 3.âCollaborative research grants, including those that 308 advance the finding of treatments and cures through basic or 309 applied research. 310 (b)âTo ensure appropriate and fair evaluation of grant 311 applications based on scientific merit, the department shall 312 appoint peer review panels of independent, scientifically 313 qualified individuals to review the scientific merit of each 314 proposal and establish its priority score. The priority scores 315 shall be forwarded to the council, and the council must consider 316 priority scores in determining which proposals are recommended 317 for funding. 318 (3)âFor purposes of performing their duties under this 319 section, the Rare Disease Advisory Council and the peer review 320 panels shall establish and follow rigorous guidelines for 321 ethical conduct and adhere to a strict policy with regard to 322 conflicts of interest. A member of the council or panel may not 323 participate in any discussion or decision of the council or 324 panel with respect to a research proposal by any firm, entity, 325 or agency with which the member is associated as a member of the 326 governing body or as an employee or with which the member has 327 entered into a contractual arrangement. 328 (4)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, 329 the balance of any appropriation from the General Revenue Fund 330 for the Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program which is not 331 disbursed but is obligated pursuant to contract or committed to 332 be expended by June 30 of the fiscal year in which the funds are 333 appropriated may be carried forward for up to 5 years after the 334 effective date of the original appropriation. 335 Section 3.âParagraph (i) is added to subsection (3) of 336 section 383.14, Florida Statutes, to read: 337 383.14âScreening for metabolic disorders, other hereditary 338 and congenital disorders, and environmental risk factors.â 339 (3)âDEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; POWERS AND DUTIES.âThe department 340 shall administer and provide certain services to implement the 341 provisions of this section and shall: 342 (i)âCreate an evidence-based educational pamphlet on the 343 nutritional needs of preterm infants to be provided to parents 344 and guardians of infants receiving care in a neonatal intensive 345 care unit. By January 1, 2027, the department shall make the 346 pamphlet available electronically to hospitals licensed under 347 chapter 395 to provide neonatal intensive care services. The 348 pamphlet must include, but need not be limited to, information 349 on preterm infants relating to all of the following: 350 1.âThe specific nutritional needs of preterm infants; 351 2.âThe health risks associated with nutritional deficits 352 and the potential need for nutritional supplementation; 353 3.âDifferent nutritional sources for infants, including 354 maternal breast milk, pasteurized human donor milk, infant 355 formula, human-milk-derived fortifiers, and bovine-milk-derived 356 fortifiers and the recommended uses for each type of nutritional 357 source; 358 4.âThe importance of maternal breast milk for meeting the 359 nutritional and developmental needs of infants, and the 360 alternative of pasteurized human donor milk if maternal breast 361 milk is not available; 362 5.âThe potential risks associated with the use of infant 363 formula, including preterm infant formula, as a sole or primary 364 nutrition source; and 365 6.âNecrotizing enterocolitis, the risk factors for 366 necrotizing enterocolitis, and the potential for a human-milk 367 based diet, including maternal and pasteurized donor breast milk 368 and human-milk-derived infant fortifiers, to reduce the risk of 369 necrotizing enterocolitis. 370 371 All provisions of this subsection must be coordinated with the 372 provisions and plans established under this chapter, chapter 373 411, and Pub. L. No. 99-457. 374 Section 4.âParagraphs (a) and (j) of subsection (2) and 375 paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (7) of section 391.308, 376 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 377 391.308âEarly Steps Program.âThe department shall implement 378 and administer part C of the federal Individuals with 379 Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), which shall be known as the 380 âEarly Steps Program.â 381 (2)âDUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT.âThe department shall: 382 (a)âAnnually prepare a grant application to the Federal 383 Government requesting the United States Department of Education 384 for funding for early intervention services for infants and 385 toddlers with disabilities and their families pursuant to part C 386 of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. 387 (j)âEstablish procedures for dispute resolution and 388 mediation as outlined in part C of the federal Individuals with 389 Disabilities Education Act Provide a mediation process and if 390 necessary, an appeals process for applicants found ineligible 391 for developmental evaluation or early intervention services or 392 denied financial support for such services. 393 (7)âTRANSITION TO EDUCATION.â 394 (a)âThe department shall establish statewide uniform 395 protocols and procedures for transition to a school district 396 program for children with disabilities or to another program as 397 part of an individual family support plan pursuant to part C of 398 the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act At least 399 90 days before a child reaches 3 years of age, the local program 400 office shall initiate transition planning to ensure the childâs 401 successful transition from the Early Steps Program to a school 402 district program for children with disabilities or to another 403 program as part of an individual family support plan. 404 (b)âAt least 90 days before a child reaches 3 years of age, 405 the local program office shall: 406 1.âNotify the local school district in which the child 407 resides and the Department of Education that the child may be 408 eligible for special education or related services as determined 409 by the local school district pursuant to ss. 1003.21 and 410 1003.57, unless the childâs parent or legal guardian has opted 411 out of such notification; and 412 2.âUpon approval by the childâs parent or legal guardian, 413 convene a transition conference that includes participation of a 414 local school district representative and the parent or legal 415 guardian to discuss options for and availability of services. 416 Section 5.âSubsection (5) of section 391.3081, Florida 417 Statutes, is amended to read: 418 391.3081âEarly Steps Extended Option.â 419 (5)âTRANSITION TO EDUCATION.âThe department shall establish 420 statewide uniform protocols and procedures for transition to a 421 school district program for children with disabilities or to 422 another program as part of an individual family support plan 423 pursuant to part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities 424 Education Act. 425 (a)âAt least 90 days before the beginning of the school 426 year following the fourth birthday of a child enrolled in the 427 Early Steps Extended Option, the local program office shall 428 initiate transition planning to ensure the childâs successful 429 transition from the Early Steps Extended Option to a school 430 district program under part B of the federal Individuals with 431 Disabilities Education Act or to another program as part of an 432 individual family support plan. Specifically, the local program 433 office shall: 434 1.âNotify the Department of Education and the local school 435 district in which the child resides that the eligible child is 436 exiting the Early Steps Extended Option, unless the childâs 437 parent or legal guardian has opted out of such notification; and 438 2.âUpon approval by the childâs parent or legal guardian, 439 convene a transition conference that includes participation of a 440 local school district representative and the parent or legal 441 guardian to discuss options for and availability of services. 442 (b)âThe local program office, in conjunction with the local 443 school district, shall modify a childâs individual family 444 support plan, or, if applicable, the local school district shall 445 develop or review an individual education plan for the child 446 pursuant to ss. 1003.57, 1003.571, and 1003.5715 which 447 identifies special education or related services that the child 448 will receive and the providers or agencies that will provide 449 such services. 450 (c)âIf a child is found to be no longer eligible for part B 451 of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act 452 during the review of an individual education plan, the local 453 program office and the local school district must provide the 454 childâs parent or legal guardian with written information on 455 other available services or community resources. 456 Section 6.âPresent paragraphs (d) through (hh) of 457 subsection (5) of section 456.074, Florida Statutes, are 458 redesignated as paragraphs (e) through (ii), respectively, and a 459 new paragraph (d) is added to that subsection, to read: 460 456.074âCertain health care practitioners; immediate 461 suspension of license.â 462 (5)âThe department shall issue an emergency order 463 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is 464 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring 465 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of 466 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar 467 offenses in another jurisdiction: 468 (d)âSection 782.04, relating to murder. 469 Section 7.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 470 464.0156, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 471 464.0156âDelegation of duties.â 472 (2)â 473 (c)âA registered nurse may not delegate the administration 474 of any controlled substance listed in Schedule II, Schedule III, 475 or Schedule IV of s. 893.03 or 21 U.S.C. s. 812, except that a 476 registered nurse may delegate: 477 1.âFor The administration of an insulin syringe that is 478 prefilled with the proper dosage by a pharmacist or an insulin 479 pen that is prefilled by the manufacturer; and 480 2.âTo a home health aide for medically fragile children as 481 defined in s. 400.462 the administration of a Schedule IV 482 controlled substance prescribed for the emergency treatment of 483 an active seizure. 484 Section 8.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 485 491.005, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 486 491.005âLicensure by examination.â 487 (3)âMARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY.âUpon verification of 488 documentation and payment of a fee not to exceed $200, as set by 489 board rule, the department shall issue a license as a marriage 490 and family therapist to an applicant whom the board certifies 491 has met all of the following criteria: 492 (c)1.âAttained one of the following: 493 a.âA minimum of a masterâs degree in marriage and family 494 therapy from a program accredited by the Commission on 495 Accreditation for Marriage and Family Therapy Education. 496 b.âA minimum of a masterâs degree with a major emphasis in 497 marriage and family therapy or a closely related field from a 498 university program accredited by the Council on Accreditation of 499 Counseling and Related Educational Programs and graduate courses 500 approved by the board. 501 c.âA minimum of a masterâs degree with an emphasis in 502 marriage and family therapy or a closely related field, with a 503 degree conferred before September 1, 2032 2027, from an 504 institutionally accredited college or university and graduate 505 courses approved by the board. 506 2.âIf the course title that appears on the applicantâs 507 transcript does not clearly identify the content of the 508 coursework, the applicant provided additional documentation, 509 including, but not limited to, a syllabus or catalog description 510 published for the course. The required masterâs degree must have 511 been received in an institution of higher education that, at the 512 time the applicant graduated, was fully accredited by an 513 institutional accrediting body recognized by the Council for 514 Higher Education Accreditation or its successor organization or 515 was a member in good standing with Universities Canada, or an 516 institution of higher education located outside the United 517 States and Canada which, at the time the applicant was enrolled 518 and at the time the applicant graduated, maintained a standard 519 of training substantially equivalent to the standards of 520 training of those institutions in the United States which are 521 accredited by an institutional accrediting body recognized by 522 the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor 523 organization. Such foreign education and training must have been 524 received in an institution or program of higher education 525 officially recognized by the government of the country in which 526 it is located as an institution or program to train students to 527 practice as professional marriage and family therapists or 528 psychotherapists. The applicant has the burden of establishing 529 that the requirements of this provision have been met, and the 530 board shall require documentation, such as an evaluation by a 531 foreign equivalency determination service, as evidence that the 532 applicantâs graduate degree program and education were 533 equivalent to an accredited program in this country. An 534 applicant with a masterâs degree from a program that did not 535 emphasize marriage and family therapy may complete the 536 coursework requirement in a training institution fully 537 accredited by the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and 538 Family Therapy Education recognized by the United States 539 Department of Education. 540 541 For the purposes of dual licensure, the department shall license 542 as a marriage and family therapist any person who meets the 543 requirements of s. 491.0057. Fees for dual licensure may not 544 exceed those stated in this subsection. 545 Section 9.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 546 1004.551, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 547 1004.551âUniversity of Florida Center for Autism and 548 Neurodevelopment.âThere is created at the University of Florida 549 the Center for Autism and Neurodevelopment. 550 (1)âThe center shall: 551 (f)âDevelop an autism micro-credential to provide 552 specialized training in supporting students with autism. 553 1.âThe micro-credential must be stackable with the autism 554 endorsement and be available to: 555 a.âInstructional personnel as defined in s. 1012.01(2); 556 b.âPrekindergarten instructors as specified in ss. 1002.55, 557 1002.61, and 1002.63; and 558 c.âChild care personnel as defined in ss. 402.302(3) and 559 1002.88(1)(e); and 560 d.âEarly intervention service providers credentialed 561 through the Early Steps Program. 562 2.âThe micro-credential must require participants to 563 demonstrate competency in: 564 a.âIdentifying behaviors associated with autism. 565 b.âSupporting the learning environment in both general and 566 specialized classroom settings. 567 c.âPromoting the use of assistive technologies. 568 d.âApplying evidence-based instructional practices. 569 3.âThe micro-credential must: 570 a.âBe provided at no cost to eligible participants. 571 b.âBe competency-based, allowing participants to complete 572 the credentialing process either in person or online. 573 c.âPermit participants to receive the micro-credential at 574 any time during training once competency is demonstrated. 575 4.âIndividuals eligible under subparagraph 1. who complete 576 the micro-credential are eligible for a one-time stipend, as 577 determined in the General Appropriations Act. The center shall 578 administer stipends for the micro-credential. 579 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.